es: Forma de la rejilla para asar: Ajustable; Puro; Rectangular; Redondo; En forma de U; En forma de V; Vertical; Otros
sk-SK: Tvar roštu na pečenie: Nastaviteľný; Plochý; Obdĺžnik; Okrúhly; V tvare písmena U; V tvare V; Vertikálny; Iné
zh-CN: 烤架形态: 可调节; 平板式; 矩形; 圆形; U 形; V 形; 立式; 其他
hr-HR: Oblik rešetke za pečenje: Podesivo; Ravna; Pravokutni; Okrugla; U obliku slova U; U obliku slova V; Vertikalno; Ostalo
sl-SI: Oblika rešetke za pečenje: Prilagodljivo; Ploščata; Pravokotno; Okrogel; V obliki črke U; V obliki črke V; Navpična; Druga
hu: Sütőrács formája: Állítható; Lapos; Téglalap; Kerek; U alakú; V alakú; Függőleges; Egyéb
bg-BG: Форма на решетката за печене: Регулируемо; Плоска форма; Правоъгълно; Кръгло; U-образно; V-образно; Вертикално; Друго
pt-PT: Forma da grelha: Ajustável; Plano; Retangular; Redondo; Em forma de U; Em forma de V; Vertical; Outro
el: Σχήμα σχάρας ψησίματος: Ρυθμιζόμενο; Επίπεδη; Ορθογώνια; Στρογγυλή; Σε σχήμα U; Σε σχήμα V; Κάθετη; Άλλο
fr: Configuration de la grille de cuisson: Ajustables; Plate; Rectangulaire; Rond; En forme de U; En forme de V; Vertical; Autre
it: Forma della griglia per arrosti: Regolabile; Piatto; Rettangolare; Rotondo; A forma di U; A forma di V; Verticale; Altro
th: รูปทรงของตะแกรงย่าง: แบบปรับได้; แบบแบน; สี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; ทรงกลม; รูปตัว U; รูปตัว V; แนวตั้ง; อื่นๆ
nb: Stekebrett-form: Regulerbar; Flat; Rektangulær; Rund; U-formet; V-formet; Vertikal; Annet
ko: 로스팅 랙 형태: 조절식; 플랫; 직사각형; 라운드; U자형; V자형; 수직; 기타
de: Bratrostform: Einstellbar; Flach; Rechteckig; Kreis; U-förmig; V-förmig; Vertikal; Sonstiges
tr: Fırın rafı şekli: Ayarlanabilir; Düz; Dikdörtgen; Yuvarlak; U şeklinde; V şeklinde; Dikey; Diğer
zh-TW: 烤架形狀: 可調節式; 扁平; 長方形; 圓形; U 形; V 形; 垂直; 其他
ru: Форма решетки для запекания: Регулируемая; Плоская; Прямоугольная; Круглая; U-образная; V-образная; Вертикальная; Другая
nl: Braadroostervormen: Verstelbaar; Vlak; Rechthoekig; Rond; U-vormig; V-vormig; Verticaal; Overig
en: Roasting rack shape: Adjustable; Flat; Rectangular; Round; U-shaped; V-shaped; Vertical; Other
fi: Paistoritilän muoto: Säädettävä; Tasainen; Suorakulmainen; Pyöreä; U:n muotoinen; V:n muotoinen; Pystysuora; Muu
da: Stegerists form: Justerbar; Flad; Rektangulær; Rund; U-formet; V-formet; Lodret; Andet
pl: Kształt rusztu do pieczenia: Regulowane; Płaskie; Prostokątne; Okrągłe; W kształcie litery U; W kształcie litery V; Pionowe; Inne
cs: Tvar pečicí mřížky: Nastavitelné; Ploché; Obdélné; Kruhové; Tvar písmene U; Tvaru písmene V; Vertikální; Jiné
sv: Form på rostgallret: Justerbar; Platt; Rektangulär; Rund; U-formad; V-formad; Vertikal; Annat
vi: Hình dáng vỉ nướng: Có thể điều chỉnh; Phẳng; Chữ nhật; Tròn; Hình chữ U; Hình chữ V; Dọc; Khác
pt-BR: Formato da prateleira de grelhar: Ajustável; Plana; Retangular; Redondo; Em forma de U; Em forma de V; Vertical; Outro
ro-RO: Forma grătarului de rotisor: Reglabil; Plat; Dreptunghiular; Rotund; În formă de U; În formă de V; Vertical; Altele
ja: ローストのラック形状: 調整可能; フラット; 長方形; ラウンド; U型; V型; 垂直; その他
lt-LT: Kepimo grotelių forma: Reguliuojamas; Plokščia; Stačiakampė; Apvali; U formos; V formos; Vertikali; Kita